Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. General Policies and Regulations.
§ 33.2-1217.
Special provisions pertaining to Interstate System, National Highway System, and federal-aid primary highways.

Notwithstanding the territorial limitation set out in §

33.2-1202

, no sign or advertisement adjacent to any Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway shall be erected, maintained, or displayed that is visible from the main traveled way within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way, except as provided in subsections B and D, and outside of an urban area, no sign or advertisement beyond 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway that is visible from the main traveled way shall be erected, maintained, or displayed with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way, except as set forth in subsection C.

The following signs, advertisements, or advertising structures may be erected, maintained, and displayed within 660 feet of the right-of-way of any Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway:Class 1: Official signs. Directional and official signs and notices, including signs and notices pertaining to the availability of food, lodging, vehicle service and tourist information, natural wonders, scenic areas, museums, and historic attractions, as authorized or required by law; however, where such signs or notices pertain to facilities or attractions that are barrier free, such signs or notices shall contain the International Symbol of Access. The Board shall determine the type, lighting, size, location, number, and other requirements of signs of this class.Class 2: On-premises signs. Signs not prohibited by other parts of this article that are consistent with the applicable provisions of this section and that advertise the sale or lease of, or activities being conducted upon, the real property where the signs are located, provided that any such signs that are located adjacent to and within 660 feet of any Interstate System highway and do not lie in commercial or industrial zones within the boundaries of incorporated municipalities, as such boundaries existed on September 21, 1959, wherein the use of real property adjacent to the Interstate System is subject to municipal regulation or control, or in areas where land use as of September 21, 1959, was clearly established by state law as industrial or commercial, shall comply with the following requirements:

Not more than one sign advertising the sale or lease of the same property may be erected or maintained in such manner as to be visible to traffic proceeding in any one direction on any one Interstate System highway;

Not more than one sign visible to traffic proceeding in any one direction on any one Interstate System highway and advertising activities being conducted upon the real property where the sign is located may be erected or maintained more than 50 feet from the advertised activity; and

No sign, except one that is not more than 50 feet from the advertised activity, that displays any trade name that refers to or identifies any service rendered or product sold may be erected or maintained unless the name of the advertised activity is displayed as conspicuously as such trade name.Class 3: Other signs. Any signs or advertisements that are located within areas adjacent to any Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway that are zoned industrial or commercial under authority of state law or in unzoned commercial or industrial areas as determined by the Board from actual land uses. The Board shall determine the size, lighting, and spacing of signs of this class, provided that such determination shall be no more restrictive than valid federal requirements on the same subject.

The following signs, advertisements, or advertising structures may be erected, maintained, and displayed beyond 660 feet of the right-of-way of any Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway outside urban areas:

Class 1 and Class 2 signs, advertisements, or advertising structures set forth in subsection B.

All other signs, advertisements, or advertising structures erected, maintained, or displayed more than 660 feet from the nearest edge of the right-of-way of an Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary highway, unless such sign or advertisement is visible from the main traveled way of such highways and erected, maintained, or displayed with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way of such highways.In determining whether a sign, advertisement, or advertising structure is “erected, maintained, or displayed with the purpose of its message being read,” the Commissioner of Highways shall consider, at a minimum, the nature of the business or product advertised thereon, the availability of such business or product to users of the controlled highway, and the visibility of the sign, advertisement, or advertising structure from the main traveled way of the controlled highway. Such visibility may be measured by considering the size or height of the sign, advertisement, or advertising structure; the configuration, size, and height of recognizable emblems, images, and lettering thereon; the angle of the sign, advertisement, or advertising structure to the main traveled way of the controlled highway; the degree to which physical obstructions hinder the view of the sign, advertisement, or advertising structure from the main traveled way of the controlled highway; and the time during which such sign, advertisement, or advertising structure is exposed to view by travelers on the main traveled way of the controlled highway traveling at the maximum and minimum speeds posted.

In order to provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public, the Department is authorized to maintain maps, permit informational directories and advertising pamphlets to be made available at rest areas, and establish information centers at rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the Commonwealth and providing such other information as may be considered desirable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lawfully erected and maintained nonconforming signs, advertisements, and advertising structures shall not be removed or eliminated by amortization under state law or local ordinances without compensation as described in subsection F.

The Commissioner of Highways is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or the power of eminent domain and to pay just compensation upon the removal of nonconforming signs, advertisements, or advertising structures lawfully erected and maintained under state law or state regulations, provided that subsequent to November 6, 1978, whenever any local ordinance that is more restrictive than state law requires the removal of such signs, advertisements, or advertising structures, the local governing body shall initiate the removal of such signs, advertisements, or advertising structures with the Commissioner of Highways, who shall have complete authority to administer the removal of such signs, advertisements, or advertising structures. Upon proof of payment presented to the local governing bodies, the local governing bodies shall reimburse the Commissioner of Highways the funds expended that are associated with the removal of such signs, advertisements, or advertising structures required by local ordinances, less any federal funds received for such purposes. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, nothing shall prohibit the local governing bodies from removing signs, advertisements, or advertising structures that are made nonconforming solely by local ordinances so long as those ordinances require the local governing bodies to pay 100 percent of the cost of removing them and just compensation upon their removal.Such compensation is authorized to be paid only for the taking from the owner of such sign or advertisement of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in such sign or advertisement and the taking from the owner of the real property on which the sign or advertisement is located of the right to erect and maintain such sign or advertisement thereon.The Commissioner of Highways shall not be required to expend any funds under this section unless and until federal-aid matching funds are made available for this purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-317.1; 1960, c. 406; 1962, c. 176; 1966, c. 663; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-370; 1976, cc. 14, 29; 1980, c. 275; 1993, c. 538; 2000, cc. 432, 449; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805; 2018, cc. 352, 353.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 352 and 353 are nearly identical, and deleted “and no such sign may be located more than 250 feet from the center of the advertised activity” at the end of subdivision B 2.

§ 33.2-1218.
Removal of billboard signs under this chapter prohibited without just compensation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no billboard sign subject to this chapter may be removed by action of a county, city, or town under Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2 without the payment of just compensation by the county, city, or town unless the billboard sign cannot remain on the property due to the site constraints of the property and removal of the billboard sign is therefore necessary for development on the property. The property owner may terminate the leasehold or other right of the billboard sign to remain on the property in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract between the property owner and the billboard sign owner, but may not be required to do so by the county, city, or town as a condition of obtaining development approval for the property unless removal of the billboard sign is necessary for development of the property or the billboard sign is nonconforming and is the principal use on the property and the zoning ordinance permits only one principal use on the property.

History.

2003, c. 569, § 33.1-370.1; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1219.
Maintenance and repair of nonconforming billboard signs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, maintenance of and repairs to nonconforming billboard signs shall be governed by this section and any applicable regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Highways, known as the “Control and Continuance of Nonconforming Signs, Advertisements, and Advertising Structures.” Nonconforming billboard signs shall be maintained in a good state of repair and shall be subject to removal for failure to do so, in accordance with §§

33.2-1211

and

33.2-1229

. In order to make repairs to a nonconforming billboard sign, the owner shall make a written request to the Commissioner of Highways and submit the documentation required by 24 VAC 30-120-170. The Commissioner of Highways shall review the written request, and if the Commissioner of Highways determines that the cost of requested repairs does not exceed a dollar amount greater than 50 percent of the current replacement cost of the entire billboard sign or structure, the Commissioner of Highways shall provide the owner of the billboard sign with a letter approving the billboard sign repairs. However, in no case shall a nonconforming billboard sign be replaced or rebuilt if the cost of the replacement or rebuilding exceeds 50 percent of the current replacement cost. The owner of the billboard sign shall apply for a building permit from the locality in which the billboard sign is located and provide a copy of the approval letter from the Commissioner of Highways as part of the application for the building permit. The Commissioner’s determination as to whether the owner of the billboard sign has complied with this section shall be binding upon the locality unless the building official, for good cause shown, submits to the Commissioner of Highways documentation objecting to the Commissioner’s determination within 30 days of the building permit application, with a copy of such documentation being provided to the billboard sign owner. The Commissioner of Highways shall consider any documentation submitted by the building official and shall reissue a determination in accordance with this section, which determination shall be binding upon the locality.

History.

2004, c. 656, § 33.1-370.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1220.
Regulations and agreements with United States implementing § 33.2-1217.

The Board may issue regulations and is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States as provided in 23 U.S.C. § 131 with respect to the regulation and control of signs, advertisements, and advertising structures in conformity with §

33.2-1217

, provided that such agreements shall not prevent the General Assembly of Virginia from amending or repealing §

33.2-1217

at any time, and provided further that in the event the federal law is amended to lessen the special restrictions applicable to signs, advertisements, and advertising structures adjacent to Interstate System or federal-aid primary highways, the Board is authorized to adopt regulations to conform to such change in federal law and to amend any agreement with the United States relating to such control.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-317.2; 1960, c. 406; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-371; 1976, c. 14; 1984, c. 745; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1221.
Selective pruning permits; fees; penalty.

As used in this section, “local beautification project” means any project in a locality that includes installation of plant materials, using public or other funds, in any public right-of-way within a county, city, or town.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1202

or any other provision of law:

The Commissioner of Highways shall by permit authorize the selective pruning, within highway rights-of-way, as highways are defined in §

33.2-1200

, including within corporate limits of municipalities, of vegetation that obstructs motorists’ view of signs displayed on outdoor advertising structures legally erected and properly maintained along the highways. Permits authorizing such pruning shall be issued in accordance with this section.

All work performed under the permit shall be (i) subject to the direction of the Commissioner of Highways, (ii) supervised on-site by a certified arborist approved by the Commissioner of Highways, (iii) completed to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of Highways, and (iv) performed solely at the expense of the permittee.

All pruning shall be performed in a manner that (i) creates a picture frame effect around the sign and (ii) beautifies the area surrounding the advertising structure. All cutting shall be limited to vegetation with trunk base diameters of less than six inches. Pruning cuts of limbs or branches or other vegetation with diameters greater than four inches and clear cutting shall not be authorized and shall be strictly prohibited. Pruning of vegetation in a highway median shall not be permitted where the locality within which the pruning is to be done has a local beautification project in the area within the scope of the selective pruning application; however, relocation or replanting of such vegetation shall be permitted in accordance with a landscaping plan as provided in this section.

Any diseased or unsightly vegetation or any vegetation that endangers the health or retards the growth of desirable vegetation may be removed at the discretion of the certified arborist supervising the work. Any such removed vegetation shall be replaced at the permittee’s expense with desirable vegetation.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to the owner or authorized agent of the owner of any sign, advertisement, or advertising structure exempted from the provisions of this article by §

33.2-1204

.

The Commissioner of Highways shall promulgate such regulations as he deems necessary or desirable to carry out the provisions of this section. Such regulations shall include the following requirements:

Every application for a permit submitted under this section shall be accompanied by photographs of the affected site and a detailed description of work proposed to be performed.

A fee of $400 shall accompany every application made to the Commissioner of Highways or, if applicable, to the locality within which the pruning is to be performed. All such fees collected by the Commissioner of Highways shall be paid by the Commissioner of Highways into the state treasury and allocated to the Board.

Every applicant shall post a bond payable to the Commonwealth, with surety approved by the Commissioner of Highways and in a form approved by the Attorney General, in the sum of $2,500, conditioned on the permittee’s fulfillment of all requirements of the permit.

No permit shall be issued under this section in order to create a new site for an outdoor advertising structure.

Where the applicant is seeking a vegetation control permit in a locality where the public right-of-way is within the jurisdictional limits of a city or town on a highway or street not within the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Highways under §

33.2-1202

or on a highway or street in a county having the county manager form of government, the Commissioner of Highways shall delegate the administration of this section to that locality, and if so delegated, the locality shall apply the provisions of this section.

If there are plant materials in the public right-of-way that are part of a local beautification project, the Commissioner of Highways or the locality, as the case may be, may include a requirement in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions 4 through 7 that as a condition of the issuance of a vegetation control permit for selective pruning, the applicant must submit a landscaping plan showing how the applicant will relocate or replant the vegetation obstructing the motorists’ view from the main traveled way of the highway or street of signs displayed on outdoor advertising structures, in lieu of the selective pruning of such plant materials. In the absence of the existence of a local beautification project in the area within the scope of the selective pruning application, no landscaping plan requirement shall be imposed on the applicant.

If subdivision 5 is applicable, the applicant shall pay the reasonable costs of implementing the landscaping plan, which may include relocating existing plant materials, purchasing new replacement plant materials, and planting vegetation that will not grow to a height or position in the future so as to obstruct motorists’ view from the main traveled way of the highway or street of signs displayed on outdoor advertising structures, as otherwise set out in the landscaping plan.

The provisions of subdivisions 4 through 6 shall apply to any local beautification project installed prior to July 1, 2006. On and after July 1, 2006, the locality shall not plant materials that obstruct motorists’ view from the main traveled way of the highway or street of signs displayed on outdoor advertising structures. If the local beautification project violates this section, in addition to other applicable penalties, the locality shall bear the costs to bring such beautification project into compliance with this section.

The locality shall provide a 30-day written notice to the Commissioner of Highways prior to installation of a local beautification project within the right-of-way of a Department maintained highway that may obstruct the motorists’ view of signs displayed on outdoor advertising structures. Such notice shall include a description of the plant materials to be used in, and a copy of the plans for, such beautification project.

Any application for vegetation control in compliance with this section submitted to the Commissioner of Highways shall be acted upon within 60 days of submission or shall be deemed approved. Any application for vegetation control in compliance with this section submitted to any city or town or on a highway or street in a county with the county manager form of government shall be acted upon within 60 days of submission or shall be deemed approved. The locality may impose conditions in approval of the landscaping plan consistent with this section and the regulations promulgated thereto. If the locality is not satisfied that the landscaping plan submitted by the applicant complies with this section, the locality may appeal to the Commissioner of Highways prior to the expiration of the 60-day period from the date of submission. If the applicant objects to the conditions imposed by the locality as part of the approval of the landscaping plan, the applicant may appeal to the Commissioner of Highways within 30 days after the final action on the landscaping plan. The appealing party shall submit a written appeal to the Commissioner of Highways, stating the reasons for such appeal, along with a fee of $400. The Commissioner of Highways shall review the landscaping plan and the reasons for the appeal and shall issue a determination in accordance with this section within 30 days after filing of the appeal, which determination shall be binding upon the applicant and the locality.

Upon issuance of a vegetation control permit in accordance with this section, the applicant shall give written notice, at least seven days in advance of any site work, as authorized by the permit, of the date and time of the commencement of the site work as approved by the permit. Such written notice shall be given to the Commissioner of Highways unless the public right-of-way is within the jurisdictional limits of a city or town on a highway or street not within the jurisdiction of the Commissioner under § 33.2-1202, in which case the written notice shall be given to the local government official who approved the permit.

Any person, firm, or corporation found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated any provision of this section, any regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or any permit issued under this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in §

33.2-1229

.

History.

1998, cc. 525, 540, § 33.1-371.1; 2006, cc. 512, 543; 2012, cc. 760, 818; 2013, c. 737; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1222.
Tree-trimming policies.

The Board shall adopt policies governing the pruning and trimming of trees during nonemergency conditions by the employees, agents, and contractors of the Department of Transportation in order to preserve roadside trees that do not adversely affect highway operations, maintenance, or safety. Such policies shall be developed in consultation with an advisory group whose members shall include representatives of the Department of Transportation, the Department of Forestry, Scenic Virginia, and the American Society of Consulting Arborists and shall be consistent with generally accepted standards recommended by nationally recognized organizations, including the American National Standards Institute.

History.

2001, c. 169, § 33.1-371.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1223.
Pasting advertisements prohibited in certain instances.

No advertisement shall be pasted or glued on any building, fence, wall, tree, rock, or other similar structure or object unless the same structure or object is an advertising structure for which a permit has been issued and is in effect.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-318; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-372; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1224.
Signs or advertising on rocks, poles, etc., within limits of highway; civil penalty.

Any person who in any manner (i) paints, prints, places, puts, or affixes any sign or advertisement upon or to any rock, stone, tree, fence, stump, pole, mile-board, milestone, danger-sign, guide-sign, guidepost, highway sign, historical marker, building, or other object lawfully within the limits of any highway or (ii) erects, paints, prints, places, puts, or affixes any sign or advertisement within the limits of any highway is subject to a civil penalty of $100. Each occurrence shall be subject to a separate penalty. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund. Signs or advertisements placed within the limits of the highway are hereby declared a public and private nuisance and may be forthwith removed, obliterated, or abated by the Commissioner of Highways or his representatives without notice. The Commissioner of Highways may collect the cost of such removal, obliteration, or abatement from the person erecting, painting, printing, placing, putting, affixing, or using such sign or advertisement. When no one is observed erecting, painting, printing, placing, putting, or affixing such sign or advertisement, the person, firm, or corporation being advertised shall be presumed to have placed the sign or advertisement and shall be punished accordingly. Such presumption, however, shall be rebuttable by competent evidence. In addition, the Commissioner of Highways or his representative may seek to enjoin any recurring violator of this section. The Commissioner of Highways may enter into agreements with any local governing body authorizing local law-enforcement agencies or other local governmental entities to act as agents of the Commissioner of Highways for the purpose of (i) enforcing the provisions of this section and (ii) collecting the penalties and costs provided for in this section. Any such agreement may provide that penalties and costs collected pursuant to such agreement shall be paid as agreed.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to signs or outdoor advertising regulated under other provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-319; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-373; 1993, c. 538; 1994, c. 696; 2012, c. 739; 2013, c. 457; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinions cited below were decided under prior law.

Political signs within the public rights-of-way. —

Following the 1993 amendment to § 33.1-351, signs, posters, and similar media of political parties or candidates for nomination or office no longer constitute “advertisements” within the meaning of the Outdoor Advertising in Sight of Public Highways Act. See opinion of Attorney General to David P. Bobzien, Esq., Fairfax County Attorney, 08-013, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (7/28/08).

To the extent that Opinion 00-001 (8/31/00) concludes that the term “advertisement” as used in the Outdoor Advertising in Sight of Public Highways Act includes political signs, it is expressly overruled. See opinion of Attorney General to David P. Bobzien, Esq., Fairfax County Attorney, 08-013, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (7/28/08).

Only Fairfax County is authorized to enter into an agreement with the Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner [now Commissioner of Highways] to enforce the provisions of § 33.1-373 as addressed in 2008 opinion 08-013. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David S. Ekern, P.E., Commissioner, Virginia Department of Transportation, 08-081, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (2/2/09).

§ 33.2-1225.
Commissioner of Highways may enter into certain agreements; civil penalties.

The Commissioner of Highways may enter into agreements with the local governing body of Fairfax County authorizing local law-enforcement agencies or other local governmental entities to act as agents of the Commissioner of Highways for the purpose of (i) enforcing the provisions of §

33.2-1224

and (ii) collecting the civil penalties and costs provided for in that section. However, the local governing body of Fairfax County shall not enter into any such agreement until it has held a public hearing thereon.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, the penalties and costs collected under this section shall be paid to Fairfax County.

Notwithstanding subsections A and B, signs and advertising promoting or providing directions to a special event erected from Saturday through the following Monday shall not be subject to an agreement provided for in subsection A.

If Fairfax County acts as an agent of the Commissioner of Highways under this section, then it shall require each of its employees and any volunteers who are authorized to act on behalf of the County to comply with the provisions of this section and any other applicable law. If a lawfully placed sign is confiscated by an employee or volunteer authorized to act for the County in violation of the authority granted under this section, the sign owner shall have the right to reclaim the sign within five business days of the date of such confiscation.

History.

1998, c. 835, § 33.1-375.1; 1999, c. 195; 2003, c. 311; 2010, cc. 497, 777, 832; 2012, c. 739; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1226.
Harmony of regulations.

No zoning board or commission or any other public officer or agency shall permit any sign, advertisement, or advertising structure that is prohibited under the provisions of this article, nor shall the Commissioner of Highways permit any sign, advertisement, or advertising structure that is prohibited by any other public board, officer, or agency in the lawful exercise of its powers.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-320; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-374; 1976, c. 14; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1227.
Violation a nuisance; abatement.

Any sign, advertisement, or advertising structure that is erected, used, maintained, operated, posted, or displayed for which no permit has been obtained where such is required, or after revocation or more than 30 days after expiration of a permit, is hereby declared to be a public and private nuisance and may be forthwith removed, obliterated, or abated by the Commissioner of Highways. The Commissioner of Highways may collect the cost of such removal, obliteration, or abatement from the person erecting, using, maintaining, operating, posting, or displaying such sign, advertisement, or advertising structure.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-321; 1954, c. 588; 1960, c. 406; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-375; 1976, c. 14; 2012, cc. 760, 818; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinions cited below were decided under prior law.

Political signs within the public highway rights-of-way. —

The placing of political signs within the public highway rights-of-way violates the statute. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James L. Camblos III, Commonwealth’s Attorney for Albemarle County, 00-001, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (8/31/00).

To the extent that Opinion 00-001 (8/31/00) concludes that the term “advertisement” as used in the Outdoor Advertising in Sight of Public Highways Act includes political signs, it is expressly overruled. See opinion of Attorney General to David P. Bobzien, Esq., Fairfax County Attorney, 08-013, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (7/28/08).

Penalty. —

A violation of the statute is a misdemeanor. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James L. Camblos III, Commonwealth’s Attorney for Albemarle County, 00-001, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (8/31/00).

§ 33.2-1228.
Disposition of fees.

All moneys received by the Commissioner of Highways under the provisions of this article shall be paid by him into the state treasury, except as provided in §§

33.2-1224

and

33.2-1229

, and allocated to the Board for use in the regulation and control of outdoor advertising and landscaping of highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-322; 1964, c. 619; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-376; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1229.
Penalties for violation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person, firm, or corporation that violates any provision of this article or applicable regulations that fails to take corrective action within 30 days as specified in a written notice from the Commissioner of Highways shall be subject to any or all of the following penalties:

A civil penalty of not more than $250 per violation. Each day during which the violation continues after a final determination by the Commissioner of Highways of such violation shall be deemed a separate violation;

Revocation by the Commissioner of Highways of any permit for the sign; or

Removal of the sign by the Commissioner of Highways. The Commissioner of Highways may collect the costs of the removal from the owner of the sign.

Any person aggrieved by the action of the Commissioner of Highways in enforcing the provisions of subsection A may appeal the decision of the Commissioner of Highways in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Commissioner of Highways may remove signs without giving a corrective action notice as provided in subsection A (i) for any violation of subdivision 3, 6, 7, 8, 9, or 10 of §

33.2-1216

or of §

33.2-1223

or (ii) if the Commissioner of Highways determines that the sign poses a risk to highway safety.

The Commissioner of Highways may recover all civil penalties authorized in subsection A in any manner permitted by law, including (i) the placement of a tax lien on the owner’s real property upon which the sign is located and (ii) the use of the Setoff Debt Collection Act (§

58.1-520

et seq.).

All civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

.

History.

2012, cc. 760, 818, § 33.1-377.1; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the phrase “established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

” was inserted at the end of subsection E.

§ 33.2-1230.
Adjustment or relocation of certain billboard signs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, general or special, whenever land is acquired due to the widening, construction, or reconstruction of any highway by purchase or by use of the power of eminent domain by any condemnor and upon such land is situated a lawfully erected billboard sign or whenever a lawfully erected billboard sign is situated adjacent to such a highway and is affected by the construction of a sound wall, such billboard sign may be relocated as provided in this section.

If a billboard sign meets all requirements under the provision of this title, the size, lighting, and spacing requirements of a locality that is certified in accordance with 23 C.F.R. § 750.706 and the federal-state agreement, if applicable, and §

4.1-113.1

in the case of outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising, but is considered nonconforming solely due to a local ordinance, the owner of the billboard sign, at his sole cost and expense, shall have the option to relocate such billboard sign to another location as close as practicable on the same property, adjusting the height or angle of the billboard sign to a height or angle that restores the visibility of the billboard sign to the same or comparable visibility as before the taking or before construction of the sound wall, provided the new location also meets all the requirements of this title and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The owner of the billboard sign shall apply for a building permit from the locality in which the billboard sign is located. The billboard sign may remain in its original location, provided the owner of the billboard sign pays monthly rent to the Commissioner of Highways or other condemnor equivalent to the monthly rent received by the property owner for the billboard prior to acquisition, and until such time as the Commissioner or other condemnor gives notice to the owner of such billboard sign that the billboard sign must be removed. The notice of removal shall be provided at least 45 days prior to the required removal date, which shall be the earlier of the certification date for a highway project advertisement for construction bids or the date that utility relocations are scheduled to commence. If all provisions of this section are met, the Commissioner shall provide written notice to the sign owner and the locality approving the relocation of the sign that is binding upon all parties.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the owner of such billboard sign to increase the size of the sign face or make changes to the sign or sign structure beyond adjustments to height or angle as specified in subsection B. A relocated billboard sign shall continue to be nonconforming in its new location unless the relocated billboard sign becomes conforming in its new location under the local ordinance.

History.

2013, cc. 603, 611, § 33.1-95.2; 2014, cc. 298, 805, 811; 2015, c. 256; 2020, c. 983.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 298 and 811 are identical and amended § 33.1-95.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendments by c. 298 have been given effect in this section by inserting “by any condemnor” and “or whenever a lawfully erected billboard sign as defined in §

33.2-1200

is situated adjacent to such a highway and is affected by the construction of a sound wall” in subsection A, and in subsection B, inserting “the size, lighting, and spacing requirements of a locality that is certified in accordance with 23 C.F.R. § 750.706 and the federal-state agreement, if applicable” and “or before construction of the sound wall” in the first sentence and adding the last two sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 deleted “as defined in §

33.2-1200

” following “highway” and twice deleted “as defined in §

33.2-1200

” following “billboard sign” in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 983, in subsection B, added the second and last sentences; in subsection C, substituted “the sign face or make changes to the sign or sign structure beyond adjustments to height or angle as specified in subsection B. A relocated billboard sign” for “the sign face, and a relocated billboard sign” and deleted the last sentence, which read, “The provisions of §

33.2-1219

shall apply to any relocation.”

§ 33.2-1231.
Construction of article.

This article shall be liberally construed with a view to the effective accomplishment of its purposes.

History.

2013, cc. 603, 611, § 33.1-378; 2014, c. 805.